test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_paavir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - päävir: # MLO, ok 
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: [pävirin, pápárin]
    päävir+N+Par: [pävirid, pápárid]
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: pápárijguin
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá

  Noun - jäävvil: # MLO, ok 
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Nom: jäävvil
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Gen: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Acc: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Ill: jáhálân
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Loc: jáhálist
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Com: jáháláin
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Abe: jáhháálttáá
    jäävvil+N+Ess: [jäṿilin, jáhálin]
    jäävvil+N+Par: [jäṿilid, jáhálid]
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Nom: jáháleh
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Gen: jáhálij
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Acc: jáhálijd
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Ill: jáháláid
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Loc: jáhálijn
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Com: jáhálijguin
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Abe: jáhálijttáá
